src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-val_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - вал: # Ordinary nouns 'word' - full paradigm including MWN
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: вал
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+Indef: валонь
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+Indef: валда
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+Indef: валонди
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+Indef: валфтома
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: валшка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+Indef: валса
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+Indef: валста
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+Indef: валс
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+Indef: валга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Tra+Indef: валкс
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: валозе
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: валне
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: валозень
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: валнень
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [валозенди, валозти]
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: валненди
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: валдон
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: валфтомон
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: валшкан
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: валсон
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: валстон
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: валозон
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: валган
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: валце
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: валхне
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: валцень
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: валхнень
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: валдот
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: валфтомот
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: валшкат
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: валсот
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: валстот
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: валозт
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: валгат
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: валоц
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: валонза
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: валонц
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: валонзон
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: валонцты
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: валонзонды
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: валдонза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: валфтомонза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: валшканза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: валсонза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: валстонза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: валозонза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: валганза
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: валоньке
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: валоньконь
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: валоньконди
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: валдонк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: валфтомонк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: валшканк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: валсонк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: валстонк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: валозонк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: валганк
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: валонте
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: валонтень
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: валонтенди
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: валдонт
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: валфтомонт
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: валшкант
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: валсонт
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: валстонт
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: валозонт
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: валгант
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: валсна
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: валснон
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: валснонды
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: валдост
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: валфтомост
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: валшкаст
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: валсост
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: валстост
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: валозост
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: валгаст
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: валхт
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Def: валсь
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+Def: валть
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Dat+Def: валти
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+Def: валхне
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+Def: валхнень
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Dat+Def: валхненди    
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: валга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: валоньге
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: валдовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: [валондивок, валондиге, валондинге]
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: валфтомовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: валшкавок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: валсовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: валстовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: валска
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: валгавок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: валкска
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валозевок
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валневок
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валозеньге
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валненьге
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [валозендивок, валозтивок, валозендиге, валозтиге, валозендинге, валозтинге]
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [валнендивок, валнендиге, валнендинге]
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валдонга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валфтомонга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валшканга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валсонга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валстонга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валозонга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: валганга
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валцевок
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валхневок
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валценьге
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валхненьге
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валдотка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валфтомотка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валшкатка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валсотка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валстотка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валозтка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: валгатка
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валоцка
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валонзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валонцка
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валонзонга
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валонцтывок
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валонзондывок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валдонзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валфтомонзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валшканзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валсонзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валстонзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валозонзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: валганзовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валонькевок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валоньконьге
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: [валонькондивок, валонькондиге, валонькондинге]
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валдонковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валфтомонковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валшканковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валсонковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валстонковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валозонковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: валганковок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валонтевок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валонтеньге
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: [валонтендивок, валонтендиге, валонтендинге]
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валдонтовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валфтомонтовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валшкантовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валсонтовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валстонтовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валозонтовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: валгантовок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валсновок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валснонга
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валснондывок
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валдостка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валфтомостка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валшкастка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валсостка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валстостка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валозостка
     вал+Hom1+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: валгастка
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: валхтка
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: валське
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: валтьке
     вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [валтивок, валтиге, валтинге]
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: валхневок
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: валхненьге
     вал+Hom1+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [валхнендивок, валхнендиге, валхнендинге]
